Virginia statutes. Title 11. Contracts.
Chapter 6. Credit Cards.

§§ 11-30 through 11-34.

Repealed by Acts 2010, c. 794, cl. 11, effective October 1, 2010.

Cross references.

For current provisions related to credit cards, see Article 3 (§

6.2-424

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 6.2.

Editor’s note.

This chapter, relating to credit cards, was repealed by Acts 2010, c. 794, cl. 11. Acts 2010, c. 794, recodified former Title 6.1, as well as this chapter and former Chapter 2.3 (§§ 59.1-21.19 through 59.1-21.28) of Title 59.1 as Title 6.2. For general notes on the recodification, see Editor’s notes under §

6.2-100

. For former §§

11-30

through 11-34, see Article 3 (§

6.2-424

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 6.2.